Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,112
Effect of amendment and restatement.

An amendment to articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, any requirement or limitation imposed upon the corporation, or any property held by it by virtue of any trust upon which such property is held by the corporation, or the existing rights of persons other than members of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation's name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 112.